Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3807
Escape from custody; effect.

Escape from custody by a prisoner subsequent to execution of a request for final disposition of any untried indictment, information, or complaint shall void the request.

Laws 1984, LB 591, § 7.